California statutes. Financial Code
 management and policies of a licensee under this division, whether through voting or through the ownership of voting power of an entity that possesses voting power of the licensee, or otherwise. Control is presumed to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, or holds 10 percent or more of the voting power of a licensee or of an entity that owns, controls, or holds, with power to vote, 10 percent or more of the voting power of a licensee. No person shall be deemed to control a licensee solely by reason of their status as an officer or director of the licensee.

(f) “Depository institution” has the same meaning as in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, and includes any credit union.

(g) “Engage in the business” means the dissemination to the public, or any part of the public, by means of written, printed, or electronic communication or any communication
 by means of recorded telephone messages or spoken on radio, television, or similar communications media, of any information relating to the making of residential mortgage loans, the servicing of residential mortgage loans, or both. “Engage in the business” also means, without limitation, making residential mortgage loans or servicing residential mortgage loans, or both.

(h) “Federal banking agencies” means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(i) “In this state” includes any activity of a person relating to making or servicing a residential mortgage loan that originates from this state and is directed to persons outside this state, or that originates from outside this state and is directed to persons inside this state, or that originates inside
 this state and is directed to persons inside this state, or that leads to the formation of a contract and the offer or acceptance thereof is directed to a person in this state (whether from inside or outside this state and whether the offer was made inside or outside the state).

(j) “Institutional investor” means the following:

(1) The United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth thereof, or any city, county, city and county, public district, public authority, public corporation, public entity, or political subdivision of a state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, or any agency or other instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing, including, by way of example, the Federal National Mortgage Association and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

(2) Any bank,
 trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, industrial bank or industrial loan company, personal property broker, consumer finance lender, commercial finance lender, or insurance company, or subsidiary or affiliate of one of the preceding entities, doing business under the authority of or in accordance with a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States.

(3) Trustees of pension, profit-sharing, or welfare funds, if the pension, profit-sharing, or welfare fund has a net worth of not less than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), except pension, profit-sharing, or welfare funds of a licensee or its affiliate, self-employed individual retirement plans, or individual retirement accounts.

(4) A corporation or other entity with outstanding securities registered under
 Section 12 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or a wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation or entity, provided that the purchaser represents either of the following:

(A) That it is purchasing for its own account for investment and not with a view to, or for sale in connection with, any distribution of a promissory note.

(B) That it is purchasing for resale pursuant to an exemption under Rule 144A (17 C.F.R. 230.144A) of the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(5) An investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940; or a wholly owned and controlled subsidiary of that company, provided that the purchaser makes either of the representations provided in paragraph (4).

(6) A residential mortgage lender or servicer
 licensed to make residential mortgage loans under this law or an affiliate or subsidiary of that person.

(7) Any person who is licensed as a securities broker or securities dealer under any law of this state, or of the United States, or any employee, officer, or agent of that person, if that person is acting within the scope of authority granted by that license or an affiliate or subsidiary controlled by that broker or dealer, in connection with a transaction involving the offer, sale, purchase, or exchange of one or more promissory notes secured directly or indirectly by liens on real property or a security representing an ownership interest in a pool of promissory notes secured directly or indirectly by liens on real property, and the offer and sale of those securities is qualified under the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968 or registered under federal securities laws, or exempt from qualification or registration.

(8) A licensed real estate broker selling the loan to an institutional investor specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, or paragraph (9) or (10).

(9) A business development company as defined in Section 2(a)(48) of the Investment Company Act of 1940 or a small business investment company licensed by the United States Small Business Administration under Section 301(c) or (d) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958.

(10) A syndication or other combination of any of the foregoing entities that is organized to purchase a promissory note.

(11) A trust or other business entity established by an institutional investor for the purpose of issuing or facilitating the issuance of securities representing undivided interests in, or rights to receive
 payments from or to receive payments primarily from, a pool of financial assets held by the trust or business entity, provided that all of the following apply:

(A) The business entity is not a sole proprietorship.

(B) The pool of assets consists of one or more of the following:

(i) Interest-bearing obligations.

(ii) Other contractual obligations representing the right to receive payments from the assets.

(iii) Surety bonds, insurance policies, letters of credit, or other instruments providing credit enhancement for the assets.

(C) The securities will be either one of the following:

(i) Rated as “investment grade” by Standard and Poor’s Corporation or Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. “Investment grade” means that the securities will be rated by Standard and Poor’s Corporation as AAA, AA, A, or BBB or by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. as Aaa, Aa, A, or Baa, including any of those ratings with “+” or “—” designation or other variations that occur within those ratings.

(ii) Sold to an institutional investor.

(D) The offer and sale of the securities is qualified under the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968 or registered under federal securities laws, or exempt from qualification or registration.

(k) “Institutional lender” means the following:

(1) The United States or
 any state, district, territory, or commonwealth thereof, or any city, county, city and county, public district, public authority, public corporation, public entity, or political subdivision of a state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, or any agency or other instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing, including, by way of example, the Federal National Mortgage Association and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

(2) Any bank, trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company, or insurance company, or service or investment company that is wholly owned and controlled by one of the preceding entities, doing business under the authority of and in accordance with a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States.

(3) Any corporation with outstanding securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or any wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation.

(4) A residential mortgage lender or servicer licensed to make residential mortgage loans under this law.

(l) “Law” means the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act.

(m) “Lender” means a person that satisfies either of the following:

(1) The person is or does all of the following:

(A) The person is an approved lender for the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, Farmers Home Administration, Government National Mortgage Association, Federal National Mortgage Association, or Federal
 Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

(B) The person directly makes residential mortgage loans.

(C) The person makes the credit decision in the loan transactions.

(2) The person is either of the following:

(A) Is not a natural person and engages in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter for a residential mortgage loan but does not solicit loan applicants, originate mortgage loans, or fund mortgage loans unless the person is also a lender under paragraph (1).

(B) Is a natural person and an independent contractor who engages in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter for a residential mortgage loan as described in subdivision (c) of Section 50003.6 but does not solicit loan
 applicants, originate mortgage loans, or fund mortgage loans unless the person is also a lender under paragraph (1).

(n) “Licensee” means, depending on the context, a person licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50120), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50130), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 50140).

(o) “Makes or making residential mortgage loans” or “mortgage lending” means processing, underwriting, or as a lender using or advancing one’s own funds, or making a commitment to advance one’s own funds, to a loan applicant for a residential mortgage loan.

(p) “Mortgage loan,” “residential mortgage loan,” or “home mortgage loan” means a federally related mortgage loan as defined in Section 1024.2 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a loan made to finance construction of a one-to-four
 family dwelling.

(q) “Mortgage servicer” or “residential mortgage loan servicer” means a person that (1) is an approved servicer for the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, Farmers Home Administration, Government National Mortgage Association, Federal National Mortgage Association, or Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, and (2) directly services or offers to service mortgage loans.

(r) “Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators.

(s) “Net worth” has the meaning set forth in Section 50201.

(t) “Own funds” means (1) cash, corporate capital, or warehouse credit lines at commercial banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, industrial loan companies, or other sources that are liability items on a lender’s financial statements, whether secured or unsecured, or (2) a lender’s affiliate’s cash, corporate capital, or warehouse credit lines at commercial banks or other sources that are liability items on the affiliate’s financial statements, whether secured or unsecured. “Own funds” does not include funds provided by a third party to fund a loan on condition that the third party will subsequently purchase or accept an assignment of that loan.

(u) “Person” means a natural person, a sole proprietorship, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a trust, a joint venture, an unincorporated organization, a joint stock company, a government or a political subdivision of a government, and
 any other entity.

(v) “Residential real property” or “residential real estate” means real property located in this state that is improved by a one-to-four family dwelling.

(w) “SAFE Act” means the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(x) “Service” or “servicing” means receiving more than three installment payments of principal, interest, or other amounts placed in escrow, pursuant to the terms of a mortgage loan and performing services by a licensee relating to that receipt or the enforcement of its receipt, on behalf of the holder of the note evidencing that loan.

(y) “Sell” includes exchange, offer to sell, or solicitation to sell.

(z) “Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(aa) For purposes of Sections 50142, 50143, and 50145, “nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a 30-year fixed rate mortgage.

(ab) For purposes of Section 50141, “expungement” means the subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such individual to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. With respect to criminal convictions in another state, that state’s definition of expungement will apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 158.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50003.5.

(a) “Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who, for compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain, takes a residential mortgage loan application or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.

(b) Mortgage loan originator does not include any of the following:

(1) An individual who performs purely administrative or clerical tasks on behalf of a person meeting the definition of a mortgage loan originator, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 50003.6. The term “administrative or clerical tasks” means the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
 processing or underwriting of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan, to the extent that the communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

(2) An individual who solely renegotiates terms for existing mortgage loans held or serviced by his or her employer and who does not otherwise act as a mortgage loan originator, unless the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the SAFE Act requires that employee to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator under state laws implementing the SAFE Act.

(3) An individual that is solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in Section 101(53D) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(4) An individual licensed as a mortgage loan originator pursuant to Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10166.01) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and the SAFE Act.

(5) An individual who is an employee of a federal, state, or local government agency or housing finance agency and who acts as a loan originator only pursuant to his or her official duties as an employee of the federal, state, or local government agency or housing finance agency.

(A) For purposes of this paragraph, the term
 “employee” means an individual whose manner and means of performance of work are subject to the right of control of, or are controlled by, a person, and whose compensation for federal income tax purposes is reported, or required to be reported, on a W-2 form issued by the controlling person.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “housing finance agency” means any authority:

(i) That is chartered by a state to help meet the affordable housing needs of the residents of the state.

(ii) That is supervised directly or indirectly by the state government.

(iii) That is subject to audit and review by the state in which it operates.

(6) (A) An employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization who exclusively originates residential mortgage loans for a bona fide nonprofit organization, and who acts as a mortgage loan originator only with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to the borrower.

(B) To qualify for the exemption under this paragraph, the bona fide nonprofit organization under this paragraph must register with the department on a form prescribed by the commissioner, along with documentation of all of the following by December 31 of each year:

(i) Status of a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(ii) That the organization promotes affordable housing or provides home ownership education or similar services.

(iii) That the organization conducts its activities in a manner that serves public or charitable purposes, rather than commercial purposes.

(iv) That the organization receives funding and revenue, and charges fees in a manner that does not incentivize the organization or its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients.

(v) That the organization compensates employees in a manner that does not incentivize employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients.

(vi) That the organization provides to, or
 identifies for, the borrower residential mortgage loans with terms favorable to the borrower and comparable to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing assistance programs.

(vii) That the organization is certified by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as a housing counselor who engages solely in traditional housing counseling services, if applicable.

(C) The commissioner may periodically require reports regarding the activities of the bona fide nonprofit organization, and shall examine the nonprofit organization’s books and records in accordance with the regulations of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or any successor guidance or requirement by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau. If the
 nonprofit organization fails to provide documentation as required by subparagraph (B), or if it does not continue to meet the criteria under subparagraph (B), the commissioner may revoke the nonprofit organization’s status as a registered bona fide nonprofit organization.

(D) For residential mortgage loans to have terms that are favorable to the borrower, the terms shall be consistent with loan origination in a public or charitable context, rather than a commercial context.

(E) In making its determinations and examinations, the commissioner may rely on the receipt and review of:

(i) Reports filed with federal, state, or local housing agencies and authorities.

(ii) Reports and attestations prescribed by the commissioner by rule or order.

(c) “Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who is all of the following:

(1) Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator.

(2) Is an employee of a depository institution, a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency, or an institution regulated by the
 Farm Credit Administration.

(3) Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(d) “Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of, and subject to the supervision and instruction of, a mortgage loan originator licensed by the state or a registered mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 10.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

50003.6.

(a) A loan processor or underwriter who does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a loan originator shall not be required to be licensed as a mortgage loan
 originator.

(b) An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

(c) An independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter for a residential mortgage loan unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage servicer license and a mortgage loan originator license under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 49.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50004.

“Fraud,” “deceit,” and “defraud” are not limited to common law fraud or deceit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50005.

This division creates and authorizes a class of exempt persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 564, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50006.

No person subject to this law shall use in its name “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” “loan association,” or related terms. This section does not apply to any person licensed under the Banking Law or the Savings Association Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Licensing: Residential Mortgage Lender [50120. - 50129.]

50120.

(a) A residential mortgage lender shall file an application for licensure under this chapter with the commissioner to make or service residential mortgage loans in this state.

(b) A licensee may not engage in the business as a residential mortgage lender under a name other than the name that appears on the license, or a legally assumed name
 disclosed either in the application or in an amendment to the application, which shall be reflected on the license.

(c) A licensee may not make or service residential mortgage loans secured by real property pursuant to the authority of a license, or an exemption from licensure, under the Real Estate Law.

(d) The commissioner may, pursuant to Section 50321, order a licensee to cease any other business conducted at any location where the licensee operates under the authority of a residential mortgage lender license, if the commissioner finds that the conduct of that business has facilitated evasions of this division or the rules adopted pursuant to this division, or that the conduct of that business is in violation of any law to which that business is subject.

(e) A license issued for a business location outside this
 state shall constitute an agreement by the licensee to, at the sole discretion of the commissioner, either (1) make the licensee’s books, accounts, papers, records, and files available to the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives in this state within 10 calendar days of a request from the commissioner or, (2) pay the reasonable expenses for travel, meals, and lodging of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives incurred during an investigation or examination made at the licensee’s location outside this state.

(f) The commissioner may, by rule, require an applicant for a residential mortgage lender or servicer license or a residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee to make some or all filings with the commissioner through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(g) The commissioner may, by rule, require licensees to pay assessments
 through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 50.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50121.

The commissioner shall issue a residential mortgage lender license upon the satisfaction of all of the following:

(a) The filing with the commissioner of a complete and executed application for licensure, which may, at the discretion of the commissioner, include background and experience disclosures required by any of the uniform application forms of the
 Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) The payment of a nonrefundable investigation fee of one hundred dollars ($100), plus the cost of fingerprint processing and clearance, and an application filing fee of nine hundred dollars ($900).

(c) An investigation of the statements required by Section 50124 based upon which the commissioner is able to issue findings that the financial responsibility, criminal records (verified by fingerprint, at the discretion of the commissioner), experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and of the partners or members thereof, if the applicant is a partnership or association, and of the principal officers and directors thereof, if the license applicant is a corporation, support a finding that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and in accordance with the requirements of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 51.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50122.

(a) Except as provided in Section 50120, the information provided on an application for a residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage servicer, or residential mortgage lender and servicer license shall be sworn testimony on a form prescribed by the commissioner. If an applicant proposes to engage in business as a residential mortgage loan servicer as well as a residential mortgage lender, this
 information shall be set forth in the application. The commissioner may issue a license under this chapter to engage in business as a residential mortgage lender or to engage in business as a residential mortgage lender and residential mortgage loan servicer. A person filing an application under this chapter to engage in business as a residential mortgage lender and a residential mortgage loan servicer is not required to file an application under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50130).

(b) The application shall contain the name and complete business and residential address or addresses of the applicant. If the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other entity, the application shall contain the names and complete business and residential addresses of each member, director, and principal officer. The application also shall include a description of the activities of the applicant in the detail and for the periods that the
 commissioner may require, including all of the following:

(1) A statement of financial solvency, noting the net worth requirements and supported by an audited financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant, and access to the supporting credit information as required by this division.

(2) A statement that the applicant or its members, directors, or principals, as appropriate, are at least 18 years of age. The statement may be made by providing each person’s date of birth.

(3) Information as to the character, fitness, financial and business responsibility, background, experience, and criminal convictions of any of the following:

(A) Any person that owns or controls, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of any class of
 stock of the applicant.

(B) Any person that controls, directly or indirectly, the election of 25 percent or more of the members of the board of directors of an applicant.

(C) Any person or entity that significantly influences or controls the management of the applicant.

(4) A description of any disciplinary action filed under any other license through which the person conducts its business.

(5) A description of any adverse judgments entered in court actions filed by borrowers based upon allegations of fraud, misrepresentation, or dishonesty in the conduct of the person’s business.

(6) A copy of the fidelity bond currently in effect.

(7) Other information as required by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 52.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50123.

(a) A residential mortgage lender license shall remain in effect until suspended, surrendered, or revoked.

(b) A residential mortgage lender licensee that ceases to engage in the business regulated by this division and desires to no longer be licensed shall inform the commissioner in writing and, at that time, surrender the license and all
 other indicia of licensure to the commissioner. The licensee shall file a plan for the withdrawal from regulated business, and the plan shall include a timetable for the disposition of the business. The plan shall also include a closing audit, review, or other agreed upon procedures performed by an independent certified public accountant prescribed by rule or order of the commissioner. Upon receipt of the written notice and plan, the commissioner shall review the plan and, if satisfactory to the commissioner, shall accept the surrender of the license. A license is not surrendered until its tender is accepted in writing by the commissioner after a review, and a finding has been made on the licensee’s plan required to be filed by this section, and a determination has been made that there is no violation of this law.

(c) A residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee may not surrender its license under this division and, under the authority of
 a real estate license, subsequently engage in residential mortgage lending or servicing activities that are subject to this division, unless the licensee has been licensed under this division for a period of five years or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 53.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50124.

(a) A residential mortgage lender or servicer shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain staff adequate to meet the requirements of this division, as prescribed by rule or order of the commissioner.

(2) Keep and maintain for 36 months from the date of final entry the business
 records and other information required by law or rules of the commissioner regarding any mortgage loan made or serviced in the course of the conduct of its business.

(3) File with the commissioner any report required under law or by rule or order of the commissioner.

(4) Disburse funds in accordance with its agreements and to make a good faith and reasonable effort to effect closing in a timely manner.

(5) Account or deliver to a person any personal property such as money, funds, deposit, check, draft, mortgage, other document, or thing of value, that has come into its possession and is not its property, or that it is not in law or equity entitled to retain under the circumstances, at the time that has been agreed upon or is required by law, or, in the absence of a fixed time, upon demand of the person entitled to
 the accounting or delivery.

(6) File with the commissioner an amendment to its application prior to any material change in the information contained in the application for licensure, including, without limitation, the plan of operation. The commissioner shall, within 20 business days of receiving a completed amendment to the application, or within a longer time if agreed to by the licensee, approve or disapprove the effectiveness of the proposed amendment.

(7) Comply with the provisions of this division, and with any order or rule of the commissioner.

(8) Submit to periodic examination by the commissioner as required by this division.

(9) Advise the commissioner by amendment to its application of any material judgment filed against, or bankruptcy
 petition filed by, the licensee within five days of the filing.

(10) Notify the commissioner, in writing, prior to opening a branch office in this state or changing its business location or locations or its branch offices from which activities subject to this division are conducted.

(11) Comply with all applicable state and federal tax return filing requirements.

(12) Refrain from employing, or paying a commission or other fee to, a mortgage loan originator who is not licensed in this state, unless the individual is exempt from licensure.

(13) Refrain from committing a crime against the laws of any state or the United States, involving moral turpitude, misrepresentation, fraudulent or dishonest dealing, or fraud, and disclose to the commissioner any
 final judgment entered against it in a civil action upon grounds or allegations of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.

(14) Refrain from engaging in conduct that would be cause for denial of a license.

(15) Remain solvent.

(16) Proceed with due care and competence in performing any act for which it is required to hold a license under this division.

(17) Comply with any other requirement established by rule of the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner may require an applicant to submit a statement agreeing to comply with the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 54.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50125.

The commissioner may refuse to issue a residential mortgage lender or servicer license if any of the following apply:

(a) The applicant is not in material compliance with a provision of this division or an order or rule of the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner cannot make the findings specified in
 subdivision (c) of Section 50121.

(c) A material requirement for issuance of a license has not been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 55.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50126.

(a) Upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may deny an application for any of the following reasons:

(1) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application.

(2) Any officer, director, general partner, or person owning or
 controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant has, within the last 10 years, (A) been convicted of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime or (B) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division.

(3) The applicant or any officer, director, general partner, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(4) The applicant employs a mortgage loan originator who is not licensed in this state, unless
 the mortgage loan originator is exempt from licensure.

(b) The application shall be considered withdrawn within the meaning of this section if the applicant fails to respond to a written notification of a deficiency in the application within 90 days of the date of the notification.

(c) The commissioner shall, within 60 days from the filing of a full and complete application for a license, including the receipt of background and investigative reports from the Department of Justice or other government agencies, and the payment of the fees required by Section 50121, issue either a residential mortgage lender or servicer license or a statement of issues prepared in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 56.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50127.

The proceedings for a denial of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50128.

As used in this act, the term “principal officer” means an officer with direct responsibility for the conduct of the residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee’s or license applicant’s lending or servicing activities in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 57.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50129.

(a) A residential mortgage lender or servicer licensed under this chapter may, under the authority of that license and subject to the provisions of this division, do both of the following:

(1) Engage as a principal in the business of buying from or selling to institutional investors residential mortgage loans by using or advancing one’s own
 funds.

(2) Engage, pursuant to a written agency contract with an institutional lender specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (k) of Section 50003, in the business of soliciting, processing applications, or applying residential loan underwriting criteria, but not engage in the business of brokerage services pursuant to this subdivision, for residential mortgage loans for that lender, using or advancing the funds of that lender, provided that no fees or charges may be demanded or collected by the residential mortgage lender licensee for any performance or service, except fees demanded by, or collected on behalf of, the institutional lender, and that the licensee gives a written disclosure to the borrower, as soon as practicable but prior to loan closing, identifying the licensee and stating that the licensee is not the lender in the transaction but has contracted to provide soliciting, processing, or underwriting services for the
 lender. Separate schedules of the number and principal amount of the loans processed and underwritten shall be included in the licensee’s annual report required by subdivision (a) of Section 50401.

(b) The act of soliciting other institutional lenders with whom a residential mortgage lender licensee has concluded an agency contract pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for placement of a loan upon declination of that loan by another institutional lender contracted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), constitutes brokerage services, and may be pursued by the licensee only following execution of a loan brokerage agreement with the borrower as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 58.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------


